Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 3. State Financial Support
§ 21-13-321.
Special education; amount within foundation program formula for special education programs and services; district reporting requirements; billing for Medicaid authorized school based services.

As used in this section:

“General fund operating expenditures” means those expenditures of the district from the general fund for operation of the district as reported to the department of education under rules promulgated by the department;

“Special education programs and services” means programs and services for students with disabilities as identified under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.

The amount provided for special education within the education resource block grant model pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(E)(II) shall be equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the amount actually expended by the district during the previous school year for special education programs and services, which shall include the amount actually expended by the district during the previous school year for reasonable administrative costs to bill for authorized Medicaid services under subsection (h) of this section. The statewide total amount reimbursed under this section in school year 2019-2020 or 2020-2021 shall not exceed the statewide total amount reimbursed under this section in school year 2018-2019, notwithstanding any additional appropriation for that purpose by the legislature.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 208, § 102.

The department of education shall adopt necessary rules and regulations to implement and administer this section. Districts shall report special education program expenditures for the applicable reporting period as required by department rule and regulation. District expenditures computed under subsection (b) of this section shall not include expenditures for employee contributions to the Wyoming retirement system exceeding five and fifty-seven hundredths percent (5.57%) of any member employee’s salary. The department shall annually review and report to the joint education interim committee regarding services provided to special education students by school districts. In addition, the department shall when necessary, conduct audits of information submitted by districts under this section and may, in accordance with W.S. 21-13-307(b), correct the information reported by districts as necessary to fairly and accurately reflect the data type, classification and format required to administer this section in accordance with law and department rule and regulation.

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 74, § 1.

In addition to subsection (d) of this section, the state department of education shall assess school district special education staffing levels based upon staffing guidelines established pursuant to W.S. 21-2-202(a)(xxiii), and report on the adequacy of staffing levels to the joint education interim committee. School districts shall report staffing and other necessary information to the department in accordance with department rules and regulations and shall provide written explanation to the department justifying district special education staffing levels. Based upon information collected under this subsection and following review, the department shall include within its report to the joint education interim committee as required under subsection (d) of this section, recommendations for improving appropriate special education program and service delivery within the state.

Assistive technology equipment included within district expenditures for special education programs and services and reported under subsection (b) of this section, which was acquired to assist a student with a specific disability, shall to the extent practicable, transfer with that student if the student transfers to another school district within the state. Within the report required under subsection (d) of this section, districts shall separately document assistive technology equipment including an inventory of assistive technology equipment and the status of the usage levels of the equipment and shall report to the department equipment which is accordingly transferred to another school district or which is currently unused by the district. The provisions of this subsection requiring transfer of assistive technology equipment apply only if no other student within the district currently uses the equipment and the equipment is capable of transfer to another district.

Beginning July 1, 2022, each school district with Medicaid eligible students receiving special education programs and services, as calculated by the department of education pursuant to subsection (j) of this section, may bill the department of health for the costs of any special education program and service covered under W.S. 42-4-103(a)(xxxiv) through (xxxvi) provided to the district’s students. The department of health shall provide payment to each eligible school district that has billed the department of health as soon as reasonably practical for the costs of approved services. By September 1 of each school year, each school district shall remit to the department of education all funds received during the prior school year from the department of health for billed services. The department of education shall remit all funds received under this subsection to the state treasurer for deposit in the school foundation program account.

A school district may report the number of Medicaid eligible students receiving special education programs and services enrolled within the school district on forms and in such manner required by the department for the 2021-2022 school year. Beginning with the 2022-2023 school year and each school year thereafter, a school district shall report the number of Medicaid eligible students receiving special education programs and services enrolled within the school district on forms and in the manner required by the department. The number of Medicaid eligible students receiving special education programs and services for a school year shall be determined by the department of education using data from October 1 of the immediately preceding school year.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 110, § 207; 2000, ch. 87, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 76, §§ 2, 3; 2003, ch. 208, §§ 101, 102; 2004, ch. 74, § 1; 2005, ch. 212, § 1; 2006, ch. 37, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 185, § 1; 2018 ch. 137, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 102, § 1, effective February 26, 2019; 2021 ch. 60, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, repealed former (e), which had provided for special education reimbursements under the education resource block grant model.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (g).

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (b), substituted “amount provided” for “adjustment,” substituted “within the education resource block grant model pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(E)(II)” for “pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309(n)(ii),” substituted “equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the amount actually expended by the district during the previous school year for special education programs and services” for “computed as follows,” and repealed former (b)(i) and (ii) pertaining to the reduction of the amount computed; substituted “subsection (b)” for “paragraph (b)(ii)” in (g); and made a stylistic change.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (d), added the present third sentence.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b), added the second sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

in (d), deleted the fourth sentence, which read: "The report shall evaluate the extent to which services are being appropriately provided and whether expenditures for services are reasonable in light of charges by providers of similar services in Wyoming."

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added "; billing for Medicaid authorized school based services" in the section heading; added ", which shall include the amount actually expended by the district during the previous school year for reasonable administrative costs to bill for authorized Medicaid services under subsection (h) of this section" in the first sentence of (b); and added (h) and (j).

Effective Dates

Laws 2019, ch. 102 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2019.

Constitutionality. —

The ten percent withholding limitation on special education costs is not a constitutionally actionable penalty since districts experiencing an increase in spending will receive funding for the increase once they demonstrate that the increased expenditure was necessary to provide services during the school year and there is no limit upon the reimbursement of necessary special education expenditures. State v. Campbell County Sch. Dist., 2001 WY 19, 19 P.3d 518,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2001).

§ 21-13-322.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 76, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1999, ch. 110, § 204, related to adjustments to the school foundation program formula for special education programs and services.

§ 21-13-323.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1999, ch. 110, § 206, pertained to salaries for teachers, administrators, and other personnel.

Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 14(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2006.

§ 21-13-324.
Teacher extra compensation adjustment to district total amount per ADM.

A district may pay extra compensation to a teacher as necessary to employ teachers for providing educational programs at locations which because of their unique circumstances require additional pay. Extra compensation under this section:

Shall not reflect district preference for higher salaries;

Shall be payment for performing regular duties and not be payment for performing any additional duties assigned to the teacher;

May be in the form of subsidized expenses other than rent or housing allowances, a cash bonus or a combination.

If compensation is paid to the teacher for costs other than rent or housing allowances, the school district shall provide information to the state department describing the difference in the amount paid by the teacher and the average comparable market rate within the county for the subsidized cost.

Upon application by a district upon a form prescribed and provided by the state department, the department shall reimburse the district from the foundation account for extra compensation paid pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, administered as if the district’s total foundation program amount computed under W.S. 21-13-309(p) was increased by the amount of extra compensation paid during the preceding year. The department shall require the district to document the need for extra compensation payments.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 110, § 105; 2006, ch. 37, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, inserted “other than rent or housing allowances” in (a)(iii) and (b); deleted “subsidized rent or other” following “form of” in (a)(iii); made a similar change in (b); and made a related change.

§ 21-13-325.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 76, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1999, ch. 110, § 205, related to adjustments to the school foundation program formula for limited English proficient students.

Laws 2002, ch. 76, § 21(a), makes the act effective on July 1, 2002.

§ 21-13-326.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1999, ch. 110, § 203, pertained to the adjustment to the foundation program for routine maintenance.

Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 14(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2006.

§ 21-13-327.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 76, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1999, ch. 110, § 208, related to additional adjustments to the school foundation program formula for small schools not provided by W.S.

21-13-309

.

§ 21-13-328.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1999, ch. 110, § 210, and Laws 2003, ch. 164, § 1, pertained to the adjustment for small school districts and vocational education.

Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 14(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2006.

§ 21-13-329.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 2003, ch. 164, § 1, pertained to state financial support for vocational education.

Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 14(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2006.

§ 21-13-330.
Virtual education; program content; agreements between districts authorized; remote education.

through (e) Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 95, § 502.

As used in this section:

“Virtual education” means instruction primarily through technology outside of the physical classroom in the statewide educational program prescribed by W.S.

21-9-101

and

21-9-102

through a program accredited by the state board under W.S. 21-2-304(a)(ii);

through (iv) Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 193, § 2.

“Full-time virtual education” means more than fifty percent (50%) of the required educational program is provided through virtual education by a school district established pursuant to the laws of this state;

“Part-time virtual education” means fifty percent (50%) or less of the required educational program is provided through virtual education by a school district established pursuant to the laws of this state.

Pursuant to rule and regulation of the department, a school district providing full-time virtual education for a student, or a student’s resident school district that has entered into an agreement with another school district to provide full-time virtual education for the student, shall:

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 193, § 2.

Enroll and assign the participating student to a school within the district offering appropriate grade level instruction;

Monitor the participating student’s progress and in accordance with the district’s assessment policies, administer or ensure his participation in required student performance evaluations and assessments at the same intervals required of other students at the participating student’s grade level;

Facilitate necessary instructional support for the student and notify and assist any student not performing satisfactorily;

Maintain the student’s records within the district’s permanent student data system including equivalent attendance as specified by department rule and regulation, assessment and other performance evaluation data, immunization and other information required by the district or by rule and regulation of the department;

Verify the virtual education program received by the participating student complies with and fulfills the state education program established by W.S.

21-9-101

and

21-9-102

and rule and regulation of the state superintendent under W.S. 21-2-202(a)(xxxi) and that the program otherwise meets district program standards;

Restrict the student’s virtual education to programs approved by the department of education pursuant to W.S. 21-2-202(a)(xxxi) and accredited by the state board.

Pursuant to department rule and regulation, a school district providing part-time virtual education to any student enrolled in another school district shall:

Complete a tuition agreement with the school district in which the student is enrolled. The agreement shall identify the services, classes and the payments to be provided by the respective school districts. The tuition shall be paid on a per course basis and shall be equal to or less than the ADM amount received by the district providing the part-time virtual education prorated to reflect the number of virtual education classes attended by the pupil;

Monitor the participating student’s academic progress in the virtual education courses and provide any necessary academic information to the school district in which the student is enrolled as required by department rule and regulation;

Facilitate necessary instructional support for the virtual education courses taken by the student and notify and assist any student not performing satisfactorily;

Maintain the student’s record for the virtual education courses taken by the student and, as necessary, share educational information with the district in which the pupil is enrolled;

Verify the virtual education program received by the participating student complies with and fulfills the state education program established by W.S.

21-9-101

and

21-9-102

and rule and regulation of the state superintendent under W.S. 21-2-202(a)(xxxi) and that the program otherwise meets program standards agreed upon by the district in which the student is enrolled and the district providing the part-time virtual education;

Restrict the student’s virtual education to programs approved by the department of education pursuant to W.S. 21-2-202(a)(xxxi) and accredited by the state board.

Each student participating in virtual education shall be included within the average daily membership (ADM) of the district in which the student is enrolled as computed under the education resource block grant model pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309(m)(iv). The virtual education program membership may be combined with any classes physically attended by the student at the school to result in a larger fractional ADM of not to exceed one (1.0) ADM as defined by department rule and regulation.

The department of education shall by rule and regulation provide a procedure under which a school district may allow a student whose custodial parent or guardian is in active military service and leaves the state of Wyoming, and whose custodial parent or guardian maintains Wyoming residency, to participate in virtual education programs offered under this section provided the district complies with this section to the extent required by department rule and regulation.

Two (2) school districts may enter into an agreement to allow a teacher in one (1) school district to remotely instruct a student in another school district. A course taught pursuant to an agreement entered into under this subsection shall not be considered virtual education for purposes of determining if a student is receiving part-time virtual education or full-time virtual education. An agreement to provide remote education pursuant to this subsection shall require that the teacher who teaches the course does so in-person, in a physical classroom setting in the district of employment and provides interactive delivery of content to the remote student. The school district providing the remotely taught courses shall:

Complete a tuition agreement with the school district in which the student is enrolled. The agreement shall identify the services, courses and the payments to be provided by the respective school districts. The tuition shall be paid on a per course basis and shall be equal to or less than the ADM amount received by the district providing the remote education prorated to reflect the number of remotely taught courses attended by the student;

Monitor the participating student’s academic progress in the remotely taught courses and provide any necessary academic information to the school district in which the student is enrolled;

Facilitate necessary instructional support for the remotely taught courses taken by the student and notify and assist any student not performing satisfactorily;

Maintain the student’s record for the remotely taught courses taken by the student and, as necessary, share educational information with the district in which the student is enrolled;

Verify the remotely taught program received by the participating student complies with and fulfills the state education program established by W.S.

21-9-101

and

21-9-102

and that the program otherwise meets program standards agreed upon by the district in which the student is enrolled and the district providing the remotely taught courses.

A teacher who teaches a course in-person, in a physical classroom setting in the teacher’s district of employment may teach the course remotely to other students in the same district using interactive delivery of course content. A course taught remotely pursuant to this subsection shall not be considered virtual education for purposes of determining if a student is receiving part-time virtual education or full-time virtual education.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 110, § 211; 2008, ch. 95, §§ 501, 502; 2016 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 193, § 1, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 18, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 18, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 191, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, repealed (a) through (e) which pertained to distance learning, and added (f) through (j).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, by ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “virtual education” for “distance education” throughout the section, rewrote (f)(i) adding and deleting language pertaining to the definition of a virtual student; added (f)(i)(v) and (f)(i)(vi); rewrote (g) added (h) and redesignated following subsections accordingly; rewrote (j) removing language pertaining to prorating virtual education students, and made related changes.

The second 2017 amendment, by ch. 193, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote the section by repealing (f)(i) through (f)(iv), and (g)(i).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other(s), both(all) have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “state superintendent” for “state board” in (g)(vi).

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 18, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (g), substituted “a student, or a student's resident school district that has entered into an agreement with another school district to provide full-time virtual education for the student, shall” for “any student shall.”

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 191, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, added (m).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (n).

Editor's notes. —

The Revisor’s Bill,
Laws 2016, ch. 78, § 3, stated: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 21-13-331.
Cooperative services incentive.

If two (2) or more districts enter into an arrangement to combine student transportation services, the district shall receive an amount in addition to the guarantee under W.S. 21-13-309(p) during the succeeding school year, subject to the following:

The combined service arrangement shall result in a reduction in the total expenditures of both participating districts for the portion of total transportation services included within the arrangement. Districts participating in a combined service arrangement may agree to apportion reduced expenditures among themselves for the purposes of paragraph (ii) of this subsection;

This additional incentive shall be equal to fifty percent (50%) of the total savings but shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) for any one (1) combined service arrangement; and

Each district participating in a combined service arrangement shall report to and submit documentation regarding the combined service arrangement to the state department.

If two (2) or more districts enter into an arrangement to combine any program or service for children with disabilities, the district shall receive an amount in addition to the guarantee under W.S. 21-13-309(p) during the succeeding school year, subject to the following:

The combined arrangement shall result in a reduction in the total expenditures of all participating districts for that program, service or portion thereof which is included within the arrangement. Districts participating in a combined service arrangement may agree to apportion reduced expenditures among themselves for the purposes of paragraph (ii) of this subsection;

This additional incentive shall be equal to fifty percent (50%) of the total savings but shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) for any one (1) combined service arrangement; and

The district reports to and submits documentation on the combined arrangement to the state department.

Districts shall report information necessary to compute any additional payments resulting from combined service agreements under subsection (a) or (b) of this section at the same time they report actual revenue collections for the purpose of reconciliation under W.S. 21-13-313(d). Not later than October 15 of each year, school districts shall be paid from the school foundation program any payments for which the district is eligible under this section. None of the additional incentive payments under this section shall be counted for the purpose of computing a district’s entitlement to revenues for any school year.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 110, § 212.

§§ 21-13-332 and 21-13-333.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections which derived from
Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 76, § 1, and
Laws 2004, ch. 108, § 101, pertained to the adjustment to foundation program formula for at-risk students.

Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 14(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2006.

§ 21-13-334.
Supplemental at-risk financial assistance program for summer school and extended day intervention and remediation programs. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 95, § 101; 2015 ch. 188, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2017 ch. 205, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 21-13-335.
Supplemental financial assistance program for instructional facilitators and instructional coaches. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 95, § 301; 2009, ch. 135, § 1, ch. 169, § 3; 2011, ch. 185, § 1; repealed by 2017 ch. 205, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 21-13-336.
Education costs of children certified by the department of health for treatment in psychiatric residential treatment facilities.

The department of education using federal or school foundation program account funds as appropriated by the legislature, or both, shall pay for the allowable education costs of children placed in psychiatric residential treatment facilities where a fee is charged and the department of health has determined the placement is medically necessary for purposes of benefit eligibility under W.S. 42-4-103(a)(xvi). This section shall not apply to children eligible for services under W.S.

21-13-315

. No district shall receive funds, either directly or indirectly, from any facility receiving payment under this section for providing educational programs and services to children placed and residing in the facility. No psychiatric residential treatment facility shall receive funds for educational services under this section unless certified by the department of health for purposes of providing medical services and approved by the department of education under the requirements of this section.

Upon placement or admittance of a child in a psychiatric residential treatment facility, the facility shall notify the department of education and the student’s resident school district in writing within seventy-two (72) hours of placement. Within seven (7) days of receiving notice, the resident school district shall notify the facility of the manner in which educational services shall be provided to the child. The district shall either:

Request the facility provide the educational services to the student;

Deliver the educational services directly to the student; or

Contract with the school district in which the psychiatric residential treatment facility is located to provide educational services to the student.

If a psychiatric residential treatment facility does not receive notification from the school district regarding educational services for the student as required by subsection (b) of this section, the facility shall provide educational services to the student provided the facility has an education program certified by the department of education pursuant to department rules and regulations.

A district that provides educational services directly to the student, or contracts with another district to provide the educational services, shall continue to count the student among its ADM. A district shall eliminate students from its ADM if the psychiatric residential treatment facility provides the educational services pursuant to this section.

Educational programs provided by psychiatric residential treatment facilities shall be certified and approved by the department of education prior to the facility billing the department for any educational services provided under this section. A facility providing educational services under this section shall bill the department of education monthly for allowable education costs as defined by department rule and regulation pursuant to W.S. 21-13-315(b).

If at any time the department of health determines the placement is no longer medically necessary for purposes of receiving benefits under W.S. 42-4-103(a)(xvi), the department of education shall discontinue payment for educational services provided by a psychiatric residential treatment facility.

All psychiatric residential treatment facilities providing educational services shall comply with the provisions of the federal Family Education Rights and Privacy Act. Not later than ten (10) days after release of the student from the psychiatric residential treatment facility, all educational records shall be transferred via a secure method to the resident school district or the district in which the student enrolls upon release.

A school district or psychiatric residential treatment facility providing educational services to a student placed in a treatment facility shall create an individualized learning plan for the student, which:

Is appropriate for the learning capabilities of the student and complies with all state and federal education requirements;

Monitors and measures the student’s progress towards meeting defined educational benchmarks and accounts for any applicable assessment requirements;

Facilitates necessary instructional support for the student and notifies and assists the student if he is not performing satisfactorily or failing to achieve performance benchmarks established within the individualized learning plan;

Maintains the student’s permanent education records, including his individualized learning plan, equivalent attendance as specified by the plan, assessment and other performance evaluation data, immunization and other information required by the state; and

Verifies the individualized learning plan complies with and fulfills the state education program established by W.S.

21-9-101

and

21-9-102

and rules and regulations of the state board and that the plan otherwise meets educational program standards.

The department of education shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations necessary for carrying out its duties under this section, including prescribing standards for educational programs of psychiatric residential treatment facilities and a certification and approval process for educational programs of facilities. Standards shall be subject to W.S.

21-9-101

and

21-9-102

and rules and regulations of the state board and shall be designed to fit the unique populations of students placed in psychiatric residential treatment facilities under this section.

For purposes of this section “resident school district” means the district in which the child’s custodial parent or guardian resides at the time of the child’s placement in the psychiatric residential treatment facility.

History.

2016 ch. 89, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 89, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2016. Approved March 4, 2016.